Utah statutes.
70A-9a-341.   Bank's rights and duties with respect to deposit account.
Except as otherwise provided in Subsection 70A-9a-340(3), and unless the bank
otherwise agrees in an authenticated record, a bank's rights and duties with
respect to a deposit account maintained with the bank are not terminated,
suspended, or modified by:
(1)  the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the
deposit account;
(2)  the bank's knowledge of the security interest; or
(3)  the bank's receipt of instructions from the secured party.
